Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.54
State building division; purpose.

The purpose of the state building division is to provide centralized procurement, operation, maintenance, and management of office space and independent review, analysis, and oversight of capital construction projects to insure that the most appropriate facilities are provided for the efficient functioning of state government. It is the intent of the Legislature that the responsibility for state facilities be centralized within the division except for buildings and grounds exempted under subsection (5) of section 81-1108.15.

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 37;

Laws 1995, LB 530, § 16.